test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_times_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - times:
    häänis+A+Sg+Nom: times
    häänis+A+Attr: timmâ
    häänis+A+Sg+Gen: timmáás
    häänis+A+Sg+Acc: timmáás
    häänis+A+Sg+Ill: timásân
    häänis+A+Sg+Loc: timásist
    häänis+A+Sg+Com: timásáin
    häänis+A+Sg+Abe: timmáásttáá
    häänis+A+Ess: timesin
    häänis+A+Par: timesid
    häänis+A+Pl+Nom: timáseh
    häänis+A+Pl+Gen: timásij
    häänis+A+Pl+Acc: timásijd
    häänis+A+Pl+Ill: timásáid
    häänis+A+Pl+Loc: timásijn
    häänis+A+Pl+Com: timásijguin
    häänis+A+Pl+Abe: timásijttáá
